Tennessee statutes. Title 41 Correctional Institutions and Inmates
Chapter 2 County Workhouses
41-2-150. Work programs — Participation required — Exceptions.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, except as provided in subsection (b), any person sentenced to the county workhouse or jail, either for a felony or misdemeanor conviction, in counties with programs whereby prisoners work either for pay or sentence reduction, or both, shall be required to participate in work programs during the period of the person's incarceration. Any prisoner who refuses to participate in those programs when work is available shall have any sentence reduction credits received pursuant to § 41-2-123 or § 41-2-146 reduced by two (2) days of credit for each one (1) day of refusal to work. Any prisoner who refuses to participate in the work programs who has not received any sentence reduction credits pursuant to § 41-2-123 or § 41-2-146 may be denied good time credit in accordance with § 41-2-111(b) and may also be denied any other privileges given to inmates in good standing for refusal to work.

The only exceptions to the requirements of subsection (a) shall be for those persons who, in the opinion of the sheriff or the superintendent of the jail, would present a security risk or a danger to the public if allowed to leave the confines of the jail or workhouse and those persons who, in the opinion of a licensed physician or licensed medical professional, should not perform the labor for medical reasons.

Acts 1997, ch. 112, § 1.

Cross-References. Sentence reduction credits, § 41-21-236.

41-2-151. Interlocal agreements for joint operation of workhouses.

Nothing in this chapter or any other provision of general law shall be construed to prevent two (2) or more counties from entering into an interlocal agreement for the joint operation of a workhouse to serve the counties so agreeing.

Acts 1999, ch. 190, § 4.

41-2-116. Statement of sentence.